Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1429
Law Enforcement
Improvement Fund; how funded.

A Law Enforcement Improvement Fund fee of two
dollars shall be taxed as costs in each criminal proceeding, including traffic
infractions and misdemeanors, filed in all courts of this state for violations
of state law or city or village ordinances. No such fee shall be collected
in any juvenile court proceeding or when waived under section 29-2709. Such
fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State
Treasurer within ten days after the close of each calendar quarter. The State
Treasurer shall credit the money to the Law Enforcement Improvement Fund.

Laws 1971, LB 929, § 10;

Laws 1972, LB 1485, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 45, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 717, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 233, § 10;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 31.

The independent act considered herein is not unconstitutional for failure to mention in the incidental provision for payment or exemption from payment of costs, nor for failure to refer to and repeal certain other statutes. State ex rel. Douglas v. Gradwohl, 194 Neb. 745, 235 N.W.2d 854 (1975).